incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCÇDDhEËFGGjHIJKLLlMNNjOPQRRrSShTThUVXXhYZZhabcçddheëfggjhijklllmnnjopqrrrsshtthuvxxhyzzhWQwq</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet" c="pre-determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbjam"  c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbkam"  c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"  c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine/feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / Plural"/>


    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="abl"    c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>

    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>

    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"   c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative tense"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="fti"    c="Future Indicative"/>
    <sdef n="adi"    c="Admirative Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="adp"    c="Admirative Present"/>
    <sdef n="opt"    c="Optative"/>
    <sdef n="part"   c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="pii"    c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="psi"    c="Simple past"/>

    <sdef n="lig"    c="Ligature"/>

    <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Numbers -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="afër__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="dhe__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="në__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="nuk__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ku__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pre-adverbs -->

    <pardef n="më__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="një__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rin</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rës</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rës</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rën</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rës</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   

    <pardef n="dy__num"> <!-- Fill out paradigm -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dhe"><i>dhe</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="edhe"><i>edhe</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="por"><i>por</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="në"><i>në</i><par n="në__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="në__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="që"><i>që</i><par n="në__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="në__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="afër"><i>afër</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="plej"><i>plej</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prej"><i>prej</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="para"><i>para</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prapa"><i>prapa</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sipas"><i>sipas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="drejt"><i>drejt</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kundër"><i>kundër</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="matanë"><i>matanë</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mbas"><i>mbas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mes"><i>mes</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="midis"><i>midis</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ndaj"><i>ndaj</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ndërmjet"><i>ndërmjet</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nga"><i>nga</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasi"><i>pasi</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="perpara"><i>perpara</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="për"><i>për</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="në"><i>në</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="që"><i>që</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="një"><i>një</i><par n="një__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dy"><i>dy</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tre"><i>tre</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="katër"><i>katër</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pesë"><i>pesë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="gjashtë"><i>gjashtë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="shtatë"><i>shtatë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tetë"><i>tetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nëntë"><i>nëntë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dhjetë"><i>dhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="njëmbëdhjetë"><i>njëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dymbëdhjetë"><i>dymbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trembëdhjetë"><i>trembëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="katërmbëdhjetë"><i>katërmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pesëmbëdhjetë"><i>pesëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="gjashtëmbëdhjetë"><i>gjashtëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="shtatëmbëdhjetë"><i>shtatëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tetëmbëdhjetë"><i>tetëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nëntëmbëdhjetë"><i>nëntëmbëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="njëzet"><i>njëzet</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tridhjetë"><i>tridhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dyzet"><i>dyzet</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pesëdhjetë"><i>pesëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="gjashtëdhjetë"><i>gjashtëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="shtatëdhjetë"><i>shtatëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tetëdhjetë"><i>tetëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nëntëdhjetë"><i>nëntëdhjetë</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="njëqind"><i>njëqind</i><par n="dy__num"/></e>
    <e lm="më"><i>më</i><par n="më__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="gati"><i>gati</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ani"><i>ani</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="avash"><i>avash</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="brenda"><i>brenda</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="çiltërisht"><i>çiltërisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dëm"><i>dëm</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dopak"><i>dopak</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="esencialisht"><i>esencialisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fshehur"><i>fshehur</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gjerësisht"><i>gjerësisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="grupe-grupe"><i>grupe-grupe</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hollazi"><i>hollazi</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jashtëzakonisht"><i>jashtëzakonisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="këputë"><i>këputë</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kryepërpjetë"><i>kryepërpjetë</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ku"><i>ku</i><par n="ku__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lerg"><i>lerg</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mbështetur"><i>mbështetur</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mizorisht"><i>mizorisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="negativisht"><i>negativisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="norvegjisht"><i>norvegjisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="parasysh"><i>parasysh</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="përfaqëz"><i>përfaqëz</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="përqark"><i>përqark</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="polonisht"><i>polonisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="qark"><i>qark</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rrallë"><i>rrallë</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sakaqherë"><i>sakaqherë</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="shkul"><i>shkul</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sipërmi"><i>sipërmi</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tekembramja"><i>tekembramja</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tradhtisht"><i>tradhtisht</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vonë"><i>vonë</i><par n="nuk__adv"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- End of sentence -->
    </e>
